Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,225
Inspection of records by directors.

(MBCA 16.05) (a) A director
of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy the books, records, and documents
of the corporation at any reasonable time to the extent reasonably related
to the performance of the director's duties as a director, including duties
as a member of a committee, but not for any other purpose or in any manner
that would violate any duty to the corporation.

(b) The district court of
the county where the corporation's principal office, or, if none in this state,
its registered office, is located may order inspection and copying of the
books, records, and documents at the corporation's expense upon application
of a director who has been refused such inspection rights, unless the corporation
establishes that the director is not entitled to such inspection rights. The
court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited
basis.

(c)
If an order is issued, the court may include provisions protecting the corporation
from undue burden or expense and provisions prohibiting the director from
using information obtained upon exercise of the inspection rights in a manner
that would violate a duty to the corporation, and the court may also order
the corporation to reimburse the director for the director's expenses incurred
in connection with the application.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 225.
January 1, 2017